North Carolina, session 2025, HB716.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 26 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 26.
"Bail.
"Part 1. General Provisions.
"§ 15A-531. Definitions.
As used in this Article the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
…
(2) "Address of record" means:
a. For a defendant or an accommodation bondsman, the address entered
on the bail bond under G.S. 15A-544.2, or any later address filed by
that person with the clerk of superior court.
…
e. For a defendant, any of the following:
a. The address entered on the bail bond under G.S. 15A-544.2.
b. The defendant's permanent or temporary address.
c. An address shown on court records.
d. An address provided to the bondsman by the defendant.
e. An address provided by anyone with actual or constructive
knowledge of the defendant's residence.
…
"§ 15A-534. Procedure for determining conditions of pretrial release.
…
(h) A bail bond posted pursuant to this section is valid for a period of not more than three
years in any case in which a pending forfeiture has not been issued and is effective and binding
upon the obligor throughout all stages of the proceeding in the trial division of the General Court
of Justice until the entry of judgment in the district court from which no appeal is taken or the
entry of judgment in the superior court. In order to be relieved of the bail bond obligation, the
surety must notify the district attorney 30 days prior to the date the bond is set to expire. At any
time within 30 days prior to the date the bond is set to expire, or if the district attorney receives
*H716-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
notification after the bond has expired, the surety is released from the bond. The obligation of an
obligor, however, is terminated at an earlier time if:in any of the following circumstances:
(1) A judge authorized to do so releases the obligor from his bond; orthe obligor's
bond.
(2) The principal is surrendered by a surety in accordance with G.S. 15A-540;
or15A-540.
(3) The proceeding is terminated by voluntary dismissal by the State before
forfeiture is ordered under G.S. 15A-544.3; or15A-544.3.
(4) Prayer for judgment has been continued indefinitely in the district court;
orcourt.
…
(6) The prosecutor enters a dismissal with leave pursuant to G.S. 15A-932(a1).
(7) The court grants a motion to set aside the bond forfeiture pursuant to any
subdivision of G.S. 15A-544.5(b)(2) through (b)(7).
…
"Part 2. Bail Bond Forfeiture.
…
"§ 15A-544.3. Entry of forfeiture.
…
(b) The forfeiture shall contain the following information:
…
(9) The following notice: "TO THE DEFENDANT AND EACH SURETY
NAMED ABOVE: The defendant named above has failed to appear as
required before the court in the case identified above. A forfeiture for the
amount of the bail bond shown above was entered in favor of the State against
the defendant and each surety named above on the date of forfeiture shown
above. This forfeiture will be set aside if, on or before the final judgment date
shown above, satisfactory evidence is presented to the court that one of the
following events has occurred:
(i) thea. The defendant's failure to appear has been stricken by the court in
which the defendant was required to appear and any order for arrest
that was issued for that failure to appear is recalled,recalled.
(ii) allb. All charges for which the defendant was bonded to appear have
been finally disposed by the court other than by the State's taking a
voluntary dismissal with leave,leave.
(iii) thec. The defendant has been surrendered by a surety or bail agent to a
sheriff of this State as provided by law,law.
(iv) thed. The defendant has been served with an Order for Arrest for the
Failure to Appear on the criminal charge in the case in question as
evidenced by a copy of an official court record, including an electronic
record,records.
(v) thee. The defendant died before or within the period between the
forfeiture and the final judgment as demonstrated by the presentation
of a death certificate,certificate.
(vi) thef. The defendant was incarcerated in a unit of the Division of Prisons
of the Department of Adult Correction and is serving a sentence or in
a unit of the Federal Bureau of Prisons located within the borders of
the State at the time of the failure to appear as evidenced by a copy of
an official court record or a copy of a document from the Division of
Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction or Federal Bureau of
Prisons,Prisons.
Page 2 House Bill 716-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(vii) theg. The defendant was incarcerated in a local, state, or federal
detention center, jail, or prison located anywhere within the borders of
the United States at the time of the failure to appear, or between the
failure to appear and the final judgment date, and the district attorney
for the county in which the charges are pending was notified of the
defendant's incarceration while the defendant was still incarcerated
and the defendant remains incarcerated for a period of 10 days
following the district attorney's receipt of notice, as evidenced by a
copy of the written notice served on the district attorney via hand
deliverydelivery, electronic delivery using a court's electronic filing or
case management system, or certified mail and written documentation
of date upon which the defendant was released from incarceration, if
the defendant was released prior to the time the motion to set aside was
filed,filed.
(viii) noticeh. Notice of forfeiture was not provided pursuant to
G.S. 15A-544.4(e), or15A-544.4(e).
(ix) thei. The court refused to issue an order for arrest for the defendant's
failure to appear, as evidenced by a copy of an official court record,
including an electronic record.
The forfeiture will not be set aside for any other reason. If this forfeiture is not
set aside on or before the final judgment date shown above, and if no
motion to set it aside is pending on that date, the forfeiture will become
a final judgment on that date. The final judgment will be enforceable
by execution against the defendant and any accommodation bondsman
and professional bondsman on the bond. The final judgment will also
be reported to the Department of Insurance. Further, no surety will be
allowed to execute any bail bond in the above county until the final
judgment is satisfied in full."
…
"§ 15A-544.5. Setting aside forfeiture.
…
(b) Reasons for Set Aside. – Except as provided by subsection (f) of this section, a
forfeiture shall be set aside for any one of the following reasons, and none other:
…
(7) The defendant was incarcerated in a local, state, or federal detention center,
jail, or prison located anywhere within the borders of the United States at the
time of the failure to appear, or any time between the failure to appear and the
final judgment date, and the district attorney for the county in which the
charges are pending was notified of the defendant's incarceration while the
defendant was still incarcerated and the defendant remains incarcerated for a
period of 10 days following the district attorney's receipt of notice, as
evidenced by a copy of the written notice served on the district attorney via
hand deliverydelivery, electronic delivery using a court's electronic filing or
case management system, or certified mail and written documentation of date
upon which the defendant was released from incarceration, if the defendant
was released prior to the time the motion to set aside was filed.
…
(d) Motion Procedure. – If a forfeiture is not set aside under subsection (c) of this section,
the only procedure for setting it aside is as follows:
…
House Bill 716-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The motion shall be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court of the
county in which the forfeiture was entered. The moving party shall, under
G.S. 1A-1, Rule 5, serve a copy of the motion on the district attorney for that
county and on the attorney for the county board of education. In counties with
an electronic filing or case management system, the moving party shall be
allowed to serve the copies of the motion using that system and the district
attorney and the attorney for the county board of education shall each be
designated as parties pursuant to that electronic service.
…
(6) If at the hearing the court allows the motion,motion based upon one of the
reasons set forth in subsection (b) of this section, the court shall enter an order
setting aside the forfeiture.forfeiture and the surety shall be relieved of the bail
bond obligation and no other forfeitures shall be issued for that bail bond.
…
"§ 15A-544.8. Relief from final judgment of forfeiture.
…
(c) Procedure. – The procedure for obtaining relief from a final judgment under this
section is as follows:
…
(2) The motion shall be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court of the
county in which the final judgment was, entered. The moving party shall,
under G.S. 1A-1, Rule 5, serve a copy of the motion on the district attorney
for that county and on the attorney for the county board of education. In
counties with an electronic filing or case management system, the moving
party shall be allowed to serve the copies of the motion using that system.
…
"§ 15A-545. District attorney submission of defendant information into nationwide
database.
For purposes of the effective implementation of this Article, each district attorney shall ensure
that the information of a criminal defendant that fails to appear in court is provided to the National
Crime Information Center within 10 days of the failure to appear in court so that this information
may be available nationwide."
SECTION 1.(b) For purposes of electronic filing pursuant to Article 26 of Chapter
15A of the General Statutes, the district attorney for each county and the attorney for each county
board of education shall be listed in the county's electronic filing or case management system as
parties and shall each have the burden of maintaining current contact information in that
electronic filing or case management system.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 58-71-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-71-1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(8b) Residential address. – The defendant's address of record or any other dwelling,
home, building, or rental that the defendant may occupy as lodging.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 58-71-40 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) No electronic system shall act in the capacity of a professional bondsman, surety
bondsman, or runner or perform any of the functions, duties, or powers prescribed for
professional bondsmen, surety bondsmen, or runners under this Article."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 58-71-200(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) In order to assist licensed sureties and their agents in evaluating potential and current
clients for the purposes of bail, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide any
Page 4 House Bill 716-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
individual with a current license to act as professional bondsman, surety bondsman, or runner
with access to search criminal records in the Administrative Office of the Courts' real-time
criminal and civil information systems.systems, including its Odyssey systems."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to motions
filed, orders issued, and notice given on or after that date.
House Bill 716-First Edition Page 5